Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201179-1108
Learners with
high ability; identification and programs.

Each school
district shall identify learners with high ability and may provide accelerated
or differentiated curriculum programs that will address the educational needs
of the identified students at levels appropriate for the abilities of those
students. The accelerated or differentiated curriculum programs shall meet
the standards of quality established by the department. Educational service
units may identify learners with high ability and provide accelerated or differentiated
curriculum programs for school districts.

Laws 1994, LB 647, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4003;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 790;

Laws 1998, LB 1229, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB333, § 14.